South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3629.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 48-23-120 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 48-23-120. The State Commission of Forestry may acquire, by purchase, gift, or otherwise, timberlands and submarginal agricultural lands, and cut over forest lands in this State at an average price not to exceed five dollars per acre and in no event above ten dollars per acre and use such lands for timber production, demonstration in forestry practice, erosion and flood prevention, game sanctuaries, public shooting grounds, public hunting, and places of general recreation. The State Commission of Forestry must not acquire land by purchase at a price exceeding its fair market value. SECTION 2.  Section 48-23-132 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 48-23-132. Revenue received from hunting privileges, rentals, fuel wood sales, the marketing of pine straw, merchantable timber, forest tree seed, and miscellaneous products on commission lands, excluding Sand Hills State Forest, must be retained by the commission to be used for reforestation of the Manchester State Foreststate forests, the development and operation of state forests and forest tree seed orchards, the maintenance of wildlife habitat, and the administration and operation of various programs on commission holdings. The commission may carry forward unexpended funds under this section to be used for those purposes. SECTION 3.  Section 48-33-60 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 48-33-60.  The county boards shall assist in the efficient performance of the requirements of this chapter and the general conduct of the forestry program in the county.  They shall review, revise and adopt the annual forest fire protection plan and the county ranger, fire wardens, towermen and all other county forest fire protection officers shall be employed, retained or dismissed only with the consent of the county forestry board.  The county ranger, fire wardens and towermen and all other county officers of the county board shall be residents of the county in which they are so employed. SECTION 4.  Section 48-33-70 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 48-33-70.  The State Commission of Forestry shall prepare for each county forestry board a plan for forest fire protection for the fiscal year and present such planan update on forest fire protection activities at the Julyannual meeting of the board. It shall have power to make and enforce all rules and regulations necessary for the administration of forest fire protection. SECTION 5.  Section 48-33-80 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 48-33-80.  The State Commission of Forestry, and any of its authorized agents and any member of a county forestry board may, at any or all times, go upon any land for the purpose of preventing or controlling forest fires, as defined herein, without making themselves liable for trespassing. SECTION 6.A.  Section 48-23-270 of the S.C. Code is repealed. B. Section 48-23-280 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 7.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----